Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB836.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Preserving Access to Reproductive Efforts Non-Traditional Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assisted reproductive technology." Procreative procedures that involve the laboratory handling of human eggs or preembryos. The term includes in vitro fertilization embryo transfer, gamete intrafallopian transfer, pronuclear stage transfer, tubal embryo transfer and zygote intrafallopian <--12345678910111213141516 transfer."ASSISTED REPRODUCTIVE TECHNOLOGY." ALL TREATMENTS OR LABORATORY PROCEDURES THAT INVOLVE THE HANDLING OF HUMAN OOCYTES OR EMBRYOS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ACHIEVING PREGNANCY, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, IN VITRO FERTILIZATION (IVF), GAMETE INTRAFALLOPIAN TRANSFER (GIFT) AND ZYGOTE INTRAFALLOPIAN TRANSFER (ZIFT).Section 3. Interference prohibited.The Commonwealth may not interfere with the use of medically appropriate methods of assisted reproductive technology or the manner in which medically appropriate methods of assisted reproductive technology are provided to an individual.Section 4. Construction.Any law enacted by the General Assembly after the effective date of this act shall be subject to section 3 unless the General Assembly expressly excludes that law from this act by specific reference.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0836PN3187 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516171819